Hawaii statutes.
§312-2 Powers of board; special fund.
The board of education may:

(1) Except as provided in section
312-3.9, make arrangements or contracts as are approved by the governor, with
any county, city, association, society, person, or persons, for the purpose of
benefiting the libraries and increasing their facilities and use;

(2) Subject to section 26-12, enter
into such arrangement or contract as is approved by the governor, with the
Friends of the Library of Hawaii, affiliates of the Friends of the Library of
Hawaii, and any tax-exempt nonprofit organization recognized under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code whose primary purpose
is to support a state library branch for the purpose of obtaining the use of
the books and property and income of the Friends of the Library of Hawaii, its
affiliates, and such tax-exempt nonprofit organizations;

(3) Cooperate by exchange and
otherwise with libraries now existing or hereafter to be formed;

(4) Receive, use, manage, or invest
moneys or other property, real, personal, or mixed which may be given,
bequeathed, devised, or in any manner received from sources other than the
legislature or any federal appropriation for any or all purposes of the
libraries;

(5) Deposit with the director of
finance in a special fund all moneys donated to the board for library services;

(6) Unless otherwise provided for
by the terms and conditions of the donation, convert, at such time as the board
may at its sole discretion determine, any or all donations of property, real, personal,
or mixed, into money to be deposited into the special fund; and

(7) Expend the moneys in the
special fund in accordance with the terms and conditions of each donation for
the purposes of the libraries.

The board shall be the trustee of the special fund
and all moneys therein shall be deemed to have been appropriated to the use and
for the purposes of the Hawaii state public library system in providing library
services. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the powers and
duties of the board hereinbefore expressed, or to empower the board to obligate
the State financially in any sum which shall not have been appropriated by the
legislature for the use of the board. [L 1909, c 83, §3; RL 1925, §418; RL
1935, §802; am L 1939, c 127, §1; RL 1945, §1913; am L 1953, c 171, §2; RL
1955, §45-3; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §§14, 18; am L 1963, c 114, §1; HRS §312-2;
am L 1981, c 150, §6; am L 1997, c 252, §3; am L 2012, c 308, §2; am L 2015, c
26, §4]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next